zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球 > 曲棍球桿保養用品: 曲棍球桿袋; 曲棍球桿護套; 曲棍球桿防滑劑; 曲棍球桿架; 曲棍球桿膠帶; 曲棍球桿蠟
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong > Jégkorongütő-ápolás: Jégkorongütő-táskák; Jégkorongütő-pengetakarók; Hokiütő tapadásjavítók; Hokiütő tartóállványok; Jégkorongütő-szalag; Jégkorongütő-viasz
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей и фигурное катание > Уход за хоккейными клюшками: Сумки и чехлы для хоккейных клюшек; Чехлы и накладки для крюков хоккейных клюшек; Средства для улучшения хвата хоккейных клюшек; Стойки для хоккейных клюшек; Лента для хоккейных клюшек; Воск для хоккейных клюшек
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Krasokorčuľovanie a hokej > Starostlivosť o hokejku: Tašky na hokejky; Návleky na čepele hokejky; Pomôcky na zlepšenie úchopu hokejky; Stojany na hokejky; Páska na hokejky; Vosk na hokejky
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Figure Skating & Hockey > Hockey Stick Care: Hockey Stick Bags; Hockey Stick Blade Covers; Hockey Stick Grip Enhancers; Hockey Stick Racks; Hockey Stick Tape; Hockey Stick Wax
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulys > Ritmušų priežiūra: Ritmušų krepšiai; Ritmušų menčių dangteliai; Ledo ritulio lazdos sukibimo gerinimo priemonės; Ledo ritulio lazdų stovai; Ritmušų juosta; Ritmušų vaškas
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Hóquei e patinagem artística > Cuidados com stick de hóquei: Sacos para stick de hóquei; Coberturas de lâminas para stick de hóquei; Potenciadores de aderência para sticks de hóquei; Estantes para sticks de hóquei; Fita para stick de hóquei; Cera para stick de hóquei
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Konståkning och hockey > Vård för hockeyklubbor: Väska för hockeyklubbor; Skydd för hockeyklubblad; Greppförbättrare för ishockeyklubbor; Klubbställ för ishockey; Tejp för hockeyklubbor; Vax för hockeyklubbor
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > สเกตลีลาและฮอกกี้ > การดูแลไม้ฮอกกี้: กระเป๋าไม้ฮอกกี้; ฝาครอบใบมีดไม้ฮอกกี้; ผลิตภัณฑ์กันลื่นสำหรับไม้ฮอกกี้; ชั้นวางไม้ฮอกกี้; เทปพันไม้ฮอกกี้; แว็กซ์สำหรับไม้ฮอกกี้
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Artistik Paten ve Hokey > Hokey Sopası Bakım Ekipmanları: Hokey Sopası Çantaları; Hokey Sopası Bıçak Kapakları; Hokey sopası tutuş artırıcıları; Hokey sopası rafları; Hokey Sopası Bandı; Hokey Sopası Balmumu
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 花样滑冰与冰球 > 冰球/曲棍球杆保养: 曲棍球球杆袋; 曲棍球杆刃套; 冰球杆防滑剂; 冰球杆架; 曲棍球球杆绑带; 曲棍球球杆蜡
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu > Bảo dưỡng gậy hockey: Túi đựng gậy hockey; Tấm bảo vệ lưỡi gậy hockey; Chất tăng độ bám gậy khúc côn cầu; Giá để gậy khúc côn cầu; Băng quấn gậy hockey; Sáp gậy hockey
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Kunstløp og hockey > Pleie av hockeykøller: Vesker for hockeykøller; Bladtrekk for hockeykøller; Grepforbedrende midler for hockeykøller; Køllestativer for hockey; Hockeykølletape; Hockeykøllevoks
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Eiskunstlauf & Hockey > Hockeyschlägerpflege: Hockeyschlägertaschen; Hockeyschläger-Klingenhüllen; Grip-Verstärker für Hockeyschläger; Regale für Hockeyschläger; Hockeyschlägerband; Hockeyschlägerwachs
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 > 하키 스틱 관리: 하키 스틱 가방; 하키 스틱 블레이드 커버; 하키 스틱 그립 강화제; 하키 스틱 랙; 하키 스틱 테이프; 하키 스틱 왁스
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Patinage artistique et hockey > Articles d'entretien des crosses de hockey: Sacs pour crosses de hockey; Couvre-lames de crosse de hockey; Produits d'adhérence pour crosses de hockey; Supports pour crosses de hockey; Ruban adhésif pour crosses de hockey; Cire pour crosses de hockey
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Kunstrijden en ijshockey > Verzorging van hockeysticks: Tassen voor hockeysticks; Bladhoezen voor hockeysticks; Gripverbeteraars voor hockeysticks; Rekken voor hockeysticks; Tape voor hockeysticks; Was voor hockeysticks
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Umjetničko klizanje i hokej > Njega hokejaške palice: Torbe za hokejaške palice; Navlake za oštrice palica za hokej; Pojačivači hvata za hokejaške palice; Stalci za palice za hokej; Traka za hokejaške palice; Vosak za hokejaške palice
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用品 > アイスホッケー用スティックケア用品: アイスホッケー用スティックバッグ; アイスホッケー用ブレードカバー; ホッケースティック用滑り止め; ホッケースティック用ラック; アイスホッケー用スティックテープ; アイスホッケー用スティックワックス
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Kunstskøjteløb og ishockey > Hockeystav – pleje: Hockeystav – tasker; Hockeystav – klingebetræk; Grebsforbedrere til hockeystave; Stativer til hockeystave; Hockeystav – tape; Hockeystav – voks
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Patinação artística e hóquei > Manutenção de tacos de hóquei: Sacos para tacos de hóquei; Capas para lâminas de taco de hóquei; Intensificadores de aderência para taco de hóquei; Suportes para taco de hóquei; Fita para taco de hóquei; Cera para taco de hóquei
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Patinaje artístico y hockey > Mantenimiento de palos de hockey: Bolsas para palos de hockey; Cubiertas de cuchillas para palos de hockey; Potenciadores de agarre para palos de hockey; Bastidores para palos de hockey; Cinta de palo de hockey; Cera para palos de hockey
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ & χόκεϊ > Φροντίδα μπαστουνιών χόκεϊ: Τσάντες μπαστουνιών χόκεϊ; Καλύμματα λεπίδων μπαστουνιών χόκεϊ; Ενισχυτικά λαβής για μπαστούνια χόκεϊ; Ράφια και βάσεις για μπαστούνια χόκεϊ; Ταινία μπαστουνιών χόκεϊ; Κερί μπαστουνιών χόκεϊ
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pattinaggio di figura e hockey > Manutenzione mazze da hockey: Borse per mazze da hockey; Coperture per lame del bastone da hockey; Antiscivolo per bastoni da hockey; Rastrelliere per bastoni da hockey; Nastro per mazze da hockey; Cera per mazze da hockey
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Taitoluistelu ja jääkiekko > Jääkiekkomailan hoito: Jääkiekkomailakassit; Jääkiekkomailan lavan suojukset; Jääkiekkomailan pitotehosteet; Jääkiekkomailatelineet; Jääkiekkomailan teippi; Jääkiekkomailan vaha
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фигурно пързаляне и хокей > Грижа за стикове за хокей: Чанти за стикове за хокей; Калъфи за остриетата на стикове за хокей; Подобрители на захвата на хокейния стик; Стойки за хокейни стикове; Тиксо за стикове за хокей; Вакса за стикове за хокей
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Umetnostno drsanje in hokej > Nega hokejske palice: Torbe za hokejske palice; Zaščitne prevleke za rezila hokejskih palic; Izboljšanje oprijema za hokejske palice; Stojala za palice za hokej; Trakovi za hokejske palice; Vosek za hokejske palice
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Łyżwiarstwo figurowe i hokej > Środki do konserwacji kijów hokejowych: Torby na kije hokejowe; Pokrowce na kije hokejowe; Środki zwiększające przyczepność kijów hokejowych; Stojaki na kije hokejowe; Taśma do kijów hokejowych; Wosk do kijów hokejowych
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Krasobruslení a hokej > Péče o hokejky: Obaly na hokejky; Chrániče čepele na hokejky; Přípravky pro lepší úchop hokejek; Regály na hokejky; Pásky na hokejky; Vosky na čepel pro hokejky
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Patinaj artistic și hochei > Îngrijirea croselor de hochei: Genți pentru crose de hochei; Apărători pentru lama crosei de hochei; Produse pentru îmbunătățirea aderenței croselor de hochei; Suporturi pentru crose de hochei; Bandă pentru crose de hochei; Ceară pentru crose de hochei